dev/proper-noun/proper-noun.ne.dix
  <!-- पृथ्वीनारायण; पृथ्वीनारायण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पृथ्वीनारायण__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पारिजात; पारिजात; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पारिजात__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुब्बा; सुब्बा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सुब्बा__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शम्शेर; शम्शेर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शम्शेर__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जुम्ला; जुम्ला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जुम्ला__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हाइटी; हाइटी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हाइटी__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पाकिस्तान; पाकिस्तान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पाकिस्तान__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अर्याल; अर्याल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अर्याल__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सप्तरी; सप्तरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सप्तरी__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अमेरिका; अमेरिका; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अमेरिका__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- देवनागरी; देवनागरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="देवनागरी__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फाल्गुनन्द; फाल्गुनन्द; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फाल्गुनन्द__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गौरी; गौरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गौरी__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गान्धी; गान्धी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गान्धी__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बालकृष्ण; बालकृष्ण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बालकृष्ण__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दशरथ; दशरथ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दशरथ__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मनु; मनु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मनु__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मोतीराम; मोतीराम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मोतीराम__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पौडेल; पौडेल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पौडेल__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सम; सम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सम__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुम्नीमा; सुम्नीमा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सुम्नीमा__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कास्की; कास्की; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कास्की__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एमाले; एमाले; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एमाले__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- श्रेष्ठ; श्रेष्ठ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="श्रेष्ठ__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यूरोप; यूरोप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यूरोप__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गुरूङ्ग; गुरूङ्ग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गुरूङ्ग__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चक्र; चक्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चक्र__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वीरगंज; वीरगंज; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वीरगंज__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मनमोहन; मनमोहन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मनमोहन__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- असन; असन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="असन__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शंकर; शंकर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शंकर__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लक्ष्मी; लक्ष्मी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लक्ष्मी__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सिङ्गापूर; सिङ्गापूर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सिङ्गापूर__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गोर्खा; गोर्खा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गोर्खा__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- इन्द्रबहादुर; इन्द्रबहादुर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="इन्द्रबहादुर__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कृष्ण; कृष्ण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कृष्ण__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बहादुर; बहादुर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बहादुर__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="पृथ्वीनारायण"><i>पृथ्वीनारायण</i><par n="पृथ्वीनारायण__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="पारिजात"><i>पारिजात</i><par n="पारिजात__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सुब्बा"><i>सुब्बा</i><par n="सुब्बा__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="शम्शेर"><i>शम्शेर</i><par n="शम्शेर__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="जुम्ला"><i>जुम्ला</i><par n="जुम्ला__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="हाइटी"><i>हाइटी</i><par n="हाइटी__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="पाकिस्तान"><i>पाकिस्तान</i><par n="पाकिस्तान__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="अर्याल"><i>अर्याल</i><par n="अर्याल__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सप्तरी"><i>सप्तरी</i><par n="सप्तरी__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="अमेरिका"><i>अमेरिका</i><par n="अमेरिका__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="देवनागरी"><i>देवनागरी</i><par n="देवनागरी__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="फाल्गुनन्द"><i>फाल्गुनन्द</i><par n="फाल्गुनन्द__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="गौरी"><i>गौरी</i><par n="गौरी__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="गान्धी"><i>गान्धी</i><par n="गान्धी__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="बालकृष्ण"><i>बालकृष्ण</i><par n="बालकृष्ण__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="दशरथ"><i>दशरथ</i><par n="दशरथ__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="मनु"><i>मनु</i><par n="मनु__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="मोतीराम"><i>मोतीराम</i><par n="मोतीराम__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="पौडेल"><i>पौडेल</i><par n="पौडेल__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सम"><i>सम</i><par n="सम__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सुम्नीमा"><i>सुम्नीमा</i><par n="सुम्नीमा__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="कास्की"><i>कास्की</i><par n="कास्की__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="एमाले"><i>एमाले</i><par n="एमाले__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="श्रेष्ठ"><i>श्रेष्ठ</i><par n="श्रेष्ठ__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="यूरोप"><i>यूरोप</i><par n="यूरोप__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="गुरूङ्ग"><i>गुरूङ्ग</i><par n="गुरूङ्ग__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="चक्र"><i>चक्र</i><par n="चक्र__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="वीरगंज"><i>वीरगंज</i><par n="वीरगंज__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="मनमोहन"><i>मनमोहन</i><par n="मनमोहन__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="असन"><i>असन</i><par n="असन__np_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="शंकर"><i>शंकर</i><par n="शंकर__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="लक्ष्मी"><i>लक्ष्मी</i><par n="लक्ष्मी__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सिङ्गापूर"><i>सिङ्गापूर</i><par n="सिङ्गापूर__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="गोर्खा"><i>गोर्खा</i><par n="गोर्खा__np_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="इन्द्रबहादुर"><i>इन्द्रबहादुर</i><par n="इन्द्रबहादुर__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="कृष्ण"><i>कृष्ण</i><par n="कृष्ण__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="बहादुर"><i>बहादुर</i><par n="बहादुर__np_m_aa"/></e>
